Washington statutes.
RCW 3.70.010

District and municipal court judges' association established.

There is established in the state an association, to be known as the Washington state district and municipal court judges' association, membership in which shall include all duly elected or appointed and qualified judges of courts of limited jurisdiction, including but not limited to district judges and municipal court judges.

[ 1994 c 32 s 3; 1987 c 3 s 2; 1984 c 258 s 50; 1961 c 299 s 123.]

NOTES:

Severability—1987 c 3: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1987 c 3 s 21.]

Court Improvement Act of 1984—Effective dates—Severability—Short title—1984 c 258: See notes following RCW 3.30.010.